Vermont, session 2025-2026, H316.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Vermont State Colleges Corporation Governance * * *
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 2172 is amended to read:
§ 2172. TRUSTEES; APPOINTMENT; VACANCIES
(a) The Corporation shall be governed by a board of 15 17 trustees who
shall be appointed or elected as follows:
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 2 of 8
(1) Biennially, the Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate,
shall appoint trustees to serve for four-year terms expiring March 1 of the year
of the biennial session. Five trustees may be in office at one time under this
subdivision. In the event of any vacancy occurring between biennial sessions
in an office under this subdivision, the Governor, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 257,
shall fill the vacancy, and the term of a person so appointed shall expire on
March 1 in the year of the next following biennial session.
(2)(A) One trustee shall be a student trustee:
(i) who is a matriculated student at an educational institution
operated by the Vermont State Colleges Corporation;
(ii) who is pursuing a degree program; and
(iii) who has reached the age of majority.
(B) The student trustee shall serve a one-year term expiring on June
1. The student trustee shall be appointed, and a vacancy may be filled, from
among those eligible students applying for the position by the decision of those
members of the steering committee of the Vermont State Colleges Student
Association who have been elected at large to that committee by the students at
their respective colleges. No student trustee may serve more than two
consecutive terms.
(3) Four trustees shall be legislative trustees who are members of the
General Assembly at the time of their election. Legislative trustees shall serve
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 3 of 8
four-year terms expiring on March 1 of the second year of the biennial session,
and they shall be elected by joint assembly of the Legislature. Vacancies for
any cause shall be filled by the General Assembly at its earliest opportunity
and the term of a person so appointed shall expire on March 1 of the next even
numbered year.
(4) Four trustees shall be elected by the Board of Trustees to four-year
terms expiring on March 1. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled by the
remaining members of the Board of Trustees, and the term of the person so
appointed shall expire on the next following March 1.
(5) One trustee shall be a faculty member employed by the Vermont
State Colleges Corporation and appointed by the executive committee of the
union or unions representing faculty to a four-year term expiring on August 1.
Vacancies for any cause shall be filled through an appointment by the
executive committee of the union or unions representing faculty, and the term
of the person so appointed shall expire on the next following August 1.
(6) One trustee shall be a staff member employed by the Vermont State
Colleges Corporation. The staff trustee shall be appointed by the union or
unions representing staff. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled through an
appointment by the union or unions representing staff and the term of the
person so appointed shall expire on the next following August 1.
* * *
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 4 of 8
(d)(1) The Board of Trustees, after notice and a hearing, may remove a
trustee for incompetency, failure to discharge duties, malfeasance, illegal acts,
or other cases inimical to the welfare of the Corporation.
* * *
(3) In the event of a vacancy occurring under this subsection, the
Governor or the Board appointing or electing authority of the removed trustee,
as applicable, shall fill the vacancy pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. VERMONT STATE COLLEGES CORPORATION; TRANSITION
On or before August 1, 2025, the one faculty trustee and one staff trustee
shall be appointed in accordance with Sec. 1 of this act.
* * * University of Vermont and State Agricultural College * * *
Sec. 3. 16 App. V.S.A. § 1-2 is amended to read:
§ 1-2. BOARD OF TRUSTEES; MEMBERSHIP, TERMS OF SERVICE;
PRESIDING CHAIR
The Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural
College shall be composed of 25 27 members, whose term of office shall be six
years, except as to those who are members ex officio and to those who are
faculty, staff, and student members. Three members shall be appointed by the
Governor with the consent of the Senate. During the legislative session of
1955, the Governor shall appoint one member for a term of two years, one
member for a term of four years, and one member for a term of six years and it
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 5 of 8
shall be the duty of the Governor during the session of the Legislature prior to
expiration of the term of office of any of the members to appoint for the term
of six years a successor to the member whose term is expiring. The terms of
office of the Trustees shall expire on the last day of February in the respective
years of expiration, and the terms of office of their successors shall thereafter
begin on March 1 and expire on the last day of February.
Nine members shall be those who have been heretofore elected by the
Legislature as members of the Board of Trustees of the University of Vermont
and State Agricultural College, and whose terms have not expired, and their
successors, and it shall be the duty of the Legislature at its session during
which the terms of office of any class of the members expire to elect three
successor members for terms of six years. The terms shall commence on
March 1 in the year of election. The nine Trustees and their successors shall
also constitute the Board of Trustees of the Vermont Agricultural College.
Nine members shall be those who have been heretofore elected on behalf of
the University of Vermont as members of the Board of Trustees of the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College and whose terms have
not expired, and their successors, and it shall be the duty of said nine Trustees
to elect successors to fill vacancies occurring among their number upon
expiration of the terms of office of any of them or otherwise. The nine
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 6 of 8
Trustees and their successors shall also constitute the Board of Trustees of the
University of Vermont.
One member shall be faculty employed by the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College and elected by the faculty to a four-year term
expiring on August 1. The Faculty Senate shall oversee all faculty trustee
elections, which shall be open to all faculty. Vacancies for any cause shall be
filled through an election, and the term of the person so elected shall expire on
the next following August 1.
One member shall be staff employed by the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College and elected by the staff to a four-year term expiring
on August 1. The Faculty Senate shall oversee all staff trustee elections, which
shall be open to all staff. Vacancies for any cause shall be filled through an
election, and the term of the person so elected shall expire on the next
following August 1.
Two members shall be students enrolled at the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College. Their terms of office shall be two years. Prior to
February 1, 1978, the Associated Directors for the Appointment of the
University of Vermont and State Agricultural College Student Trustees,
Incorporated shall select and appoint one student for a term of one year and
one student for a term of two years, both of whom shall be enrolled as full-time
undergraduate or full-time graduate students. Annually thereafter, the
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 7 of 8
Directors shall meet to select and appoint one student trustee for a term of two
years in accordance with the provisions of this section. The Directors shall fill
any vacancy occurring among the student trustee members upon the expiration
of the term of office of any of them or otherwise. A student shall be eligible to
serve as a Trustee, provided the student is a full-time undergraduate or full-
time graduate student matriculating in accordance with the degree
qualifications and requirements established by the University of Vermont and
State Agricultural College and if the student remains in that status throughout
the length of the term of office. The term of office of a Student Trustee shall
begin on March 1 following the date of appointment, and the term of office
shall end the last day of February in the year of expiration. Any student
elected hereunder shall have reached the age of 18.
All Trustees so appointed and elected as hereinbefore provided, shall,
together with his or her Excellency, the Governor of the State, and the
President, who shall be, ex officio, a member, constitute an entire Board of
Trustees of the corporation known as the University of Vermont and State
Agricultural College, who shall have the entire management and control of its
property and affairs, and in all things relating thereto, except in the elections to
fill vacancies, as aforesaid, shall act together jointly, as one entire Board of
Trustees; provided, that all future elections or appointments to the Board of
Trustees shall be made with special reference to preventing any religious
VT LEG #379630 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.316
2025 Page 8 of 8
denominational preponderance in the Board. The Board shall annually, at its
first regular meeting after the election of new trustees, elect one of its members
to serve as Chair.
Sec. 4. UNIVERSITY OF VERMONT AND STATE AGRICULTURAL
COLLEGE; TRANSITION
On or before August 1, 2025, new faculty members of the Board of Trustees
of the University of Vermont and State Agricultural College shall be elected
pursuant to Sec. 1 of this act.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #379630 v.2